Maryland, session 2025, HB0051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
19–108.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN
ORGANIZATION THAT:
(1) ENGAGES PROFESSIONALS TO CREATE, EDIT, PRODUCE, AND
DISTRIBUTE ORIGINAL CONTENT CONCERNING MATTERS OF PUBLIC INTEREST
THROUGH REPORTING ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING CONDUCTING INTERVIEWS,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0051*

HOUSE BILL 51
OBSERVING CURRENT EVENTS, AND ANALYZING DOCUMENTS OR OTHER
INFORMATION;
(2) EMPLOYS AT LEAST ONE FULL–TIME EMPLOYEE FOR AT LEAST 30
HOURS EACH WEEK WHO:
(I) PROVIDES COVERAGE OF STATE OR LOCAL COMMUNITY
NEWS;
(II) RESIDES WITHIN 50 MILES OF THE COVERAGE AREA; AND
(III) GATHERS, PREPARES, COLLECTS, PHOTOGRAPHS, WRITES,
EDITS, REPORTS, OR PUBLISHES ORIGINAL STATE OR LOCAL COMMUNITY NEWS FOR
DISSEMINATION TO THE STATE OR LOCAL COMMUNITY; AND
(3) DISCLOSES IN ITS PRINT PUBLICATION OR ON ITS WEBSITE THE
BENEFICIAL OWNERSHIP OF THE ENTITY OR, IN THE CASE OF A NONPROFIT, ITS
BOARD OF DIRECTORS.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION
THAT:
(I) IF THE ORGANIZATION PUBLISHES ONLY A PRINT
PUBLICATION:
1. HAS PUBLISHED AT LEAST ONE PRINT PUBLICATION
OVER THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS; AND
2. A. MAINTAINS A VALID UNITED STATES POSTAL
SERVICE PERIODICAL PERMIT; OR
B. DEDICATES AT LEAST 25% OF THE ORGANIZATION’S
CONTENT TO LOCAL NEWS;
(II) IF THE ORGANIZATION PUBLISHES DIGITAL–ONLY
CONTENT:
1. HAS PUBLISHED AT LEAST ONE PIECE ABOUT THE
STATE OR A LOCAL COMMUNITY EACH WEEK DURING THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS;
AND

HOUSE BILL 51 3
2. AT LEAST 33% OF THE ORGANIZATION’S DIGITAL
AUDIENCE, ON AVERAGE OVER THE PREVIOUS 12–MONTH PERIOD, IS LOCATED IN
THE STATE;
(III) IF THE ORGANIZATION PUBLISHES PRINT AND DIGITAL
CONTENT, SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH; AND
(IV) IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE AND IN ITS FILINGS WITH THE INTERNAL REVENUE
SERVICE STATES THAT THE MISSION OF THE ORGANIZATION IS TO COVER STATE OR
LOCAL NEWS.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION
THAT RECEIVED FOR THE PREVIOUS YEAR AT LEAST 50% OF ITS GROSS RECEIPTS
FROM:
(I) A POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEE OR OTHER ENTITY
DESCRIBED IN § 527 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; OR
(II) AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION
UNDER § 501(C)(4) OR (6) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(C) (1) AT LEAST 120 DAYS BEFORE THE SALE OF A LOCAL NEWS
ORGANIZATION, THE LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE
TO:
(I) EMPLOYEES AND REPRESENTATIVES OF EMPLOYEES THAT
WILL BE AFFECTED BY THE SALE;
(II) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE
COUNTY WHERE THE LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION IS LOCATED; AND
(III) ANY NONPROFIT IN THE STATE THAT IS IN THE BUSINESS OF
BUYING LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATIONS.
(2) THE SALE OF A LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION MAY NOT BE
COMPLETED UNLESS THE WRITTEN NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION IS PROVIDED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.